Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1755.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 5, to read: ARTICLE 5. PRACTICE OF LAW START_STATUTE12-181. Judges prohibited from practicing law; exceptions A judge may not practice law in this state except that the judge may: 1. Represent himself pro se. 2. without compensation, give legal advice to and draft or review documents for a member of the judge's family but may not serve as the family member's lawyer in any forum. END_STATUTE